Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201776-1603
Operator; duty.

(1) An operator shall not knowingly permit a leased space at a self-service storage facility to be used for residential purposes.

(2) An occupant shall not use a leased space for residential purposes.

Laws 2017, LB492, § 3.